Mississippi statutes. Title 93. Domestic Relations
Article 4. Miscellaneous.

§ 93-27-401.
Codification.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 519, § 40, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 93-27-402.
Prior proceedings and determinations.

A motion or other request for relief made in a child custody proceeding or to enforce a child custody determination which was commenced before July 1, 2004, is governed by the law in effect at the time the motion or other request was made.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 519, § 41, eff from and after July 1, 2004.